Hawaii statutes.
§325-125 Registry
record requirements; duration of retention. (a) The establishment of an
individual's record in the
registry shall not require the prior consent of a patient or the consent of a
patient's parent or legal guardian in the case of a minor or dependent.

(b) The department of health shall make
available to the patient or the patient's
parent or legal guardian in the case of a minor or dependent, via the patient's health care provider or
birthing hospital, a written description of the purpose and benefits of the
registry as well as the procedure for refusing inclusion in the registry.

(c) A patient's, or in the case of a minor,
the minor's parent's or legal guardian's, choice to refuse inclusion in the
registry shall be documented in writing on a form or in a format approved by
the department of health.

(d) Each health care provider or birthing
hospital shall maintain the records of refusal of inclusion and shall report
any refusal to the department of health in a manner specified by rule.

(e) When a patient, or in the case of a minor,
the minor's parent or legal guardian, chooses to refuse inclusion in the
registry, minimal demographic information, including the patient's name and
date of birth, shall be maintained within the registry system to identify the
patient as having elected to refuse inclusion in the registry. If the patient
has an existing record in the registry at the time that the refusal
documentation is submitted, all other patient demographic and immunization
information shall be removed from the registry.

(f) All registry authorized users shall make
available for inspection by the department of health all medical records
relating to patient demographic and immunization information recorded in the
registry or documentation of the patient's, or in the case of a minor, the
minor's parent's or legal guardian's refusal of inclusion in the registry for
the purposes of performing registry-related quality improvement or quality
assessment activities.

(g) Registry information for any individual
included within the registry shall be retained as a part of the registry for
twenty-five years after the last entry, except in the case of minors, whose
records shall be retained during the period of minority plus twenty-five years
after the minor reaches the age of majority. At the conclusion of the
retention period, the data stored in the registry for that individual shall be
archived. [L 2010, c 113, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 275, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next